nl: Bonenpasta variëteit: Zwartebonenpasta; Tuinbonenpasta; Cheonggukjang; Doenjang; Doubanjiang; Douchi (gefermenteerde zwarte bonen); Tuinbonenpasta; Gefermenteerde tahoe; Gefermenteerde sojabonenpasta; Pikante bonenpasta; Miso; Rodebonenpasta; Gekruide bonenpasta; Zoete bonenpasta; Overige
es: Variedad de pasta de frijoles: Pasta de frijol negro; Pasta de habas; Cheonggukjang; Doenjang; Doubanjiang; Douchi (frijoles negros fermentados); Pasta de habas; Cuajada de frijol fermentada; Pasta de soya fermentada; Pasta de frijol picante; Miso; Pasta de frijol rojo; Pasta de frijol condimentada; Pasta de frijol dulce; Otro
it: Varietà di pasta di fagioli: Pasta di fagioli neri; Pasta di fave; Cheonggukjang; Doenjang; Doubanjiang; Douchi (fagioli neri fermentati); Pasta di fave; Tofu fermentato; Pasta di soia fermentata; Pasta di fagioli piccante; Miso; Pasta di fagioli rossi; Pasta di fagioli condita; Pasta di fagioli dolce; Altro
pl: Odmiana pasty fasolowej: Pasta z czarnej fasoli; Pasta z bobu; Cheonggukjang; Doenjang; Doubanjiang; Douchi (fermentowana czarna fasola); Pasta z bobu; Fermentowane tofu; Fermentowana pasta sojowa; Ostra pasta fasolowa; Miso; Pasta z czerwonej fasoli; Przyprawiona pasta fasolowa; Słodka pasta fasolowa; Inne
hu: Babpaszta-változat: Feketebab-paszta; Lóbabpaszta; Cheonggukjang; Doenjang; Doubanjiang; Douchi (erjesztett feketebab); Fava babpaszta; Erjesztett babtúró; Erjesztett szójababpaszta; Csípős babpaszta; Miso; Vörösbab-paszta; Ízesített babpaszta; Édes babpaszta; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta paste od graha: Pasta od crnog graha; Pasta od boba; Cheonggukjang; Doenjang; Doubanjiang; Douchi (fermentirani crni grah); Pasta od fava graha; Fermentirani tofu; Fermentirana pasta od soje; Ljuta pasta od graha; Miso; Pasta od crvenog graha; Začinjena pasta od graha; Slatka pasta od graha; Ostalo
fi: Paputahnan tyyppi: Mustapaputahna; Härkäpaputahna; Cheonggukjang; Doenjang; Doubanjiang; Douchi (fermentoidut mustapavut); Fava-paputahna; Fermentoitu tofu; Fermentoitu soijapaputahna; Tulinen paputahna; Miso; Punapaputahna; Maustettu paputahna; Makea paputahna; Muu
en: Bean paste variety: Black Bean Paste; Broad Bean Paste; Cheonggukjang; Doenjang; Doubanjiang; Douchi (Fermented Black Beans); Fava Bean Paste; Fermented Bean Curd; Fermented Soybean Paste; Hot Bean Paste; Miso; Red Bean Paste; Seasoned Bean Paste; Sweet Bean Paste; Other
sv: Bönpastasort: Svartbönspasta; Bondbönspasta; Cheonggukjang; Doenjang; Doubanjiang; Douchi (fermenterade svarta bönor); Favabönspasta; Fermenterad tofu; Fermenterad sojabönspasta; Stark bönpasta; Miso; Röd bönpasta; Kryddad bönpasta; Söt bönpasta; Övrigt
bg-BG: Вид/сорт бобена паста: Паста от черен боб; Паста от бакла; Чонгукджан; Туенджан; Доубандзян; Доучи (ферментирал черен боб); Паста от фава боб; Ферментирала бобова извара; Паста от ферментирала соя; Пикантна бобова паста; Мисо; Паста от червен боб; Овкусена бобова паста; Сладка бобова паста; Друго
da: Variationer af bønnepasta: Sort bønnepasta; Hestebønnepasta; Cheonggukjang; Doenjang; Doubanjiang; Douchi (fermenterede sorte bønner); Favabønnepasta; Fermenteret tofu; Fermenteret sojabønnepasta; Stærk bønnepasta; Miso; Rød bønnepasta; Krydret bønnepasta; Sød bønnepasta; Anden
th: เต้าเจี้ยวชนิดต่างๆ: เต้าเจี้ยวดำ; เต้าเจี้ยวถั่วปากอ้า; ชองกุกจัง; ทเวนจัง; โต้วป้านเจี้ยง; เต้าซี่ (ถั่วดำหมัก); เต้าเจี้ยวถั่วฟาวา; เต้าหู้ยี้; เต้าเจี้ยว; เต้าเจี้ยวเผ็ด; มิโซะ; ถั่วแดงกวน; เต้าเจี้ยวปรุงรส; เต้าเจี้ยวหวาน; อื่นๆ
ru: Разновидность фасолевой пасты: Паста из черных бобов; Паста из конских бобов; Чхонгукчан; Твенджан; Тоубаньцзян; Доучи (ферментированные черные бобы); Паста из бобов фава; Ферментированный тофу; Ферментированная соевая паста; Острая бобовая паста; Мисо; Паста из красных бобов; Приправленная бобовая паста; Сладкая бобовая паста; Другое
el: Ποικιλία πάστας φασολιών: Πάστα μαύρων φασολιών; Πάστα κουκιών; Cheonggukjang; Doenjang; Doubanjiang; Douchi (Ζυμωμένα μαύρα φασόλια); Πάστα φάβας; Ζυμωμένο τυρί σόγιας; Ζυμωμένη πάστα σόγιας; Πικάντικη πάστα φασολιών; Μίσο; Πάστα κόκκινων φασολιών; Καρυκευμένη πάστα φασολιών; Γλυκιά πάστα φασολιών; Άλλο
ko: 장류 종류: 블랙빈 페이스트; 잠두콩 페이스트; 청국장; 된장; 두반장; 두치(발효 검은콩); 파바빈 페이스트; 발효 두부; 발효 대두 페이스트; 매운 콩 페이스트; 미소; 팥 앙금; 양념 콩 페이스트; 스위트 빈 페이스트; 기타
lt-LT: Pupelių pastos rūšis: Juodųjų pupelių pasta; Pupų pasta; Cheonggukjang; Doenjang; Doubanjiang; Douchi (fermentuotos juodosios pupelės); Daržo pupų pasta; Fermentuota pupelių varškė; Fermentuotų sojų pupelių pasta; Aštri pupelių pasta; Miso; Raudonųjų pupelių pasta; Pagardinta pupelių pasta; Saldžioji pupelių pasta; Kita
zh-TW: 豆醬品種: 黑豆醬; 蠶豆醬; 清麴醬; 大醬; 豆瓣醬; 豆豉 (發酵黑豆); 蠶豆醬; 豆腐乳; 發酵大豆醬; 辣豆醬; 味噌; 紅豆沙; 調味豆醬; 甜麵醬; 其他
pt-BR: Variedade de pasta de feijão: Pasta de feijão preto; Pasta de fava; Cheonggukjang; Doenjang; Doubanjiang; Douchi (feijão preto fermentado); Pasta de fava; Coalhada de feijão fermentada; Pasta de soja fermentada; Pasta de feijão apimentada; Missô; Pasta de feijão vermelho; Pasta de feijão temperada; Pasta de feijão doce; Outros
sk-SK: Forma fazuľovej pasty: Pasta z čiernych fazúľ; Pasta z bôbov; Cheonggukjang; Doenjang; Doubanjiang; Douchi (fermentované čierne fazule); Pasta z bôbov fava; Fermentované tofu; Fermentovaná sójová pasta; Pikantná fazuľová pasta; Miso; Pasta z červených fazúľ; Ochutená fazuľová pasta; Sladká fazuľová pasta; Iné
nb: Bønnepasta-variant: Svart bønnepasta; Hestebønnepasta; Cheonggukjang; Doenjang; Doubanjiang; Douchi (fermenterte svarte bønner); Favabønnepasta; Fermentert tofu; Fermentert soyabønnepasta; Sterk bønnepasta; Miso; Rød bønnepasta; Krydret bønnepasta; Søt bønnepasta; Annet
de: Sorte der Bohnenpaste: Schwarze Bohnenpaste; Saubohnenpaste; Cheonggukjang; Doenjang; Doubanjiang; Douchi (Fermentierte schwarze Bohnen); Ackerbohnenpaste; Fermentierter Tofu; Fermentierte Sojabohnenpaste; Scharfe Bohnenpaste; Miso; Rote Bohnenpaste; Gewürzte Bohnenpaste; Süße Bohnenpaste; Sonstige
fr: Variété de pâte de haricots: Pâte de haricots noirs; Pâte de fèves; Cheonggukjang; Doenjang; Doubanjiang; Douchi (haricots noirs fermentés); Pâte de fèves; Tofu fermenté; Pâte de soja fermentée; Pâte de haricots piquante; Miso; Pâte de haricots rouges; Pâte de haricots assaisonnée; Pâte de haricots sucrée; Autre
zh-CN: 豆沙品种: 黑豆酱; 蚕豆酱; 清麹酱; 大酱; 豆瓣酱; 豆豉（发酵黑豆）; 蚕豆酱; 腐乳; 发酵黄豆酱; 辣豆酱; 味噌; 红豆沙; 调味豆酱; 甜豆酱; 其他
cs: Odrůda fazolové pasty: Pasta z černých fazolí; Pasta z bobu obecného; Cheonggukjang; Doenjang; Doubanjiang; Douchi (fermentované černé fazole); Pasta z fava fazolí; Fermentované tofu; Fermentovaná sójová pasta; Pikantní fazolová pasta; Miso; Pasta z červených fazolí; Ochucená fazolová pasta; Sladká fazolová pasta; Jiné
vi: Loại tương đậu: Tương đậu đen; Tương đậu tằm; Cheonggukjang; Doenjang; Doubanjiang; Douchi (Đậu đen lên men); Tương đậu fava; Chao; Tương đậu nành lên men; Tương đậu cay; Miso; Tương đậu đỏ; Tương đậu gia vị; Tương đậu ngọt; Khác
pt-PT: Variedade de pasta de feijão: Pasta de feijão preto; Pasta de fava; Cheonggukjang; Doenjang; Doubanjiang; Douchi (feijão preto fermentado); Pasta de fava; Coalhada de feijão fermentada; Pasta de soja fermentada; Pasta de feijão picante; Miso; Pasta de feijão vermelho; Pasta de feijão temperada; Pasta de feijão doce; Outro
tr: Fasulye ezmesi çeşidi: Siyah fasulye ezmesi; Bakla ezmesi; Cheonggukjang; Doenjang; Doubanjiang; Douchi (Fermente siyah fasulye); Fava ezmesi; Fermente fasulye loru; Fermente soya fasulyesi ezmesi; Acı fasulye ezmesi; Miso; Kırmızı fasulye ezmesi; Baharatlı fasulye ezmesi; Tatlı fasulye ezmesi; Diğer
sl-SI: Različne vrste fižolove paste: Pasta iz črnega fižola; Pasta iz boba; Cheonggukjang; Doenjang; Doubanjiang; Douchi (fermentiran črni fižol); Pasta iz boba (fava); Fermentirana fižolova skuta; Fermentirana sojina pasta; Pekoča fižolova pasta; Miso; Pasta iz rdečega fižola; Začinjena fižolova pasta; Sladka fižolova pasta; Drugo
ja: 豆ペーストの種類: 黒豆ペースト; ブロードビーンペースト; チョングッチャン; テンジャン; 豆板醤; トウチ (発酵黒豆); ファヴァビーンペースト; 腐乳; 発酵大豆ペースト; 辛味噌; 味噌; 小豆ペースト; 味付け大豆ペースト; 甘豆ペースト; その他
ro-RO: Varietate de pastă de fasole: Pastă de fasole neagră; Pastă de fasole lată; Cheonggukjang; Doenjang; Doubanjiang; Douchi (Fasole neagră fermentată); Pastă de fasole fava; Brânză de soia fermentată; Pastă de soia fermentată; Pastă de fasole iute; Miso; Pastă de fasole roșie; Pastă de fasole condimentată; Pastă de fasole dulce; Altele